North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 6. Unorganized Militia.

§ 127A-87.
Unorganized militia ordered out for service.

The commander in chief may at any time, in order to execute the law, secure the safety of persons and property, suppress riots or insurrections, repel invasions or provide disaster relief, in addition to the North Carolina National Guard, the State defense militia and the naval militia, order out the whole or any part of the unorganized militia. When the militia of this State or a part thereof is called forth under the Constitution and laws of the United States, the Governor shall first order out for service the North Carolina National Guard, the State defense militia or naval militia, or any part thereof that may be necessary, and if the number available is insufficient, the Governor shall then order out any part of the unorganized militia that the Governor may deem necessary. During the absence or organizations of the North Carolina National Guard or naval militia in the service of the United States, their state designations shall not be given to new organizations.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 46; C.S., s. 6860; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, throughout the section, inserted “North Carolina” and made minor stylistic changes; and in the second sentence, substituted “or any part thereof that may be necessary” for “or such thereof as may be necessary.”

§ 127A-88.
Manner of ordering out unorganized militia.

The Governor shall, when ordering out the unorganized militia, designate the number. The Governor may order them out either by calling for volunteers or by draft. The Governor may attach them to the several organizations of the North Carolina National Guard, the State defense militia or naval militia, as may be best for the service.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 47; C.S., s. 6861; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, twice substituted “The Governor” for “He” and inserted “North Carolina.”

§ 127A-89.
Draft of unorganized militia.

If the unorganized militia is ordered out by draft, the Governor shall designate the persons in each county to make the draft, and prescribe rules and regulations for conducting it.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 48; C.S., s. 6862; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “conducting it” for “conducting the same.”

§ 127A-90.
Punishment for failure to appear.

Every member of the militia ordered out for duty, or who shall volunteer or be drafted, who does not appear at the time and place ordered, shall be liable to punishment as determined by a court-martial.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 49; C.S., s. 6863; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, substituted “punishment as determined by a court-martial” for “such punishment as a court-martial may determine.”

§ 127A-91.
Promotion of marksmanship.

The Adjutant General is authorized to detail a commissioned officer of the North Carolina National Guard or member of the State defense militia to promote rifle marksmanship among the State defense militia and the unorganized militia of the State. The officer or member so detailed shall serve without pay and it shall be the duty of the officer or member to organize and supervise rifle clubs in schools, colleges, universities, clubs and other groups, under rules and regulations prescribed by the Adjutant General and in a manner that will make them, when duly organized, acceptable for membership in the National Rifle Association. Provided, that these duties and efforts shall in nowise interfere or conflict with clubs of schools or units operating in Reserve Officers’ Training Corps or similar schools under the supervision of instructors of the Armed Forces of the United States.

History.

1937, c. 449; 1963, c. 1016, s. 2; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the second sentence, substituted “it shall be the duty of the officer or member” for “it shall be his duty” and made minor stylistic changes, and in the last sentence, substituted “these duties” for “such duties,” “Reserve Officers’ Training Corps” for “R.O.T.C.,” and “instructors of the Armed Forces of the United States” for “armed forces instructors.”

§§ 127A-92 through 127A-96.

Reserved for future codification purposes.